District of Columbia statutes.
6-222

Local law exemption.

The provisions of Chapter 17 of Title 42, shall not apply to the property managers of the residential component of any Housing Properties under the jurisdiction of the Authority. The activities of such property managers shall be regulated by the applicable statutes, rules, and regulations of the United States.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 23, 47 DCR 1325

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.